hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kemping és túrázás > Hordozható WC-k és zuhanyzók: Hordozható zuhanyzók és privát kabinok; Hordozható mosdók és mosogatóállomások; Hordozható WC-k és vizeletürítő eszközök; Hordozható víztartályok; Hordozható vízcsapok
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Kampiranje i planinarenje > Prijenosni zahodi i tuševi: Prijenosni tuševi i ograde za privatnost; Prijenosni sudoperi i stanice za pranje; Prijenosni zahodi i uređaji za mokrenje; Prijenosni spremnici za vodu; Prijenosne slavine za vodu
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Kempování a turistika > Přenosné toalety a sprchy: Přenosné sprchy a sprchové kouty; Přenosná umyvadla a mycí stanice; Přenosné toalety a pisoáry; Přenosné kanystry na vodu; Přenosné vodní kohoutky a baterie
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 캠핑/하이킹 > 휴대용 변기/샤워기: 휴대용 샤워기/가림막; 휴대용 싱크대 및 세면대; 휴대용 변기/소변기; 휴대용 물통; 휴대용 수전 및 수도꼭지
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Camping y senderismo > Duchas y retretes portátiles: Recintos privados y duchas portátiles; Lavabos y estaciones de lavado portátiles; Urinarios y retretes portátiles; Recipientes de agua portátiles; Grifos de agua portátiles
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Кемпинги и походы > Походные души и туалеты: Походные души и палатки для них; Портативные раковины и умывальники; Походные туалеты и писсуары; Портативные емкости для воды; Портативные краны и диспенсеры для воды
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > キャンプ ・ハイキング > 携帯トイレ・シャワー: シャワー用簡易テント; ポータブルシンク・手洗い場; 携帯トイレ; ポータブルウォーターコンテナ; ポータブル蛇口・タップ
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Cắm trại & Đi bộ đường dài > Nhà vệ sinh và phòng tắm di động: Phòng tắm di động và lều quây kín; Bồn rửa và trạm rửa di động; Thiết bị vệ sinh cá nhân cầm tay; Bình chứa nước di động; Vòi nước di động
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การตั้งแคมป์และเดินเขา > ห้องน้ำและที่อาบน้ำเคลื่อนที่: ที่อาบน้ำเคลื่อนที่และที่กั้นสำหรับความเป็นส่วนตัว; อ่างล้างจานและจุดล้างมือพกพา; อุปกรณ์ห้องน้ำและโถส้วมเคลื่อนที่; ภาชนะใส่น้ำพกพา; ก๊อกน้ำพกพา
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Camping i chodzenie po górach > Przenośne toalety i prysznice: Przenośne prysznice i parawany; Przenośne umywalki i stacje mycia; Przenośne toalety i pisuary; Przenośne zbiorniki na wodę; Przenośne krany i dozowniki wody
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Camping & Hiking > Portable Toilets & Showers: Portable Showers & Privacy Enclosures; Portable Sinks & Wash Stations; Portable Toilets & Urination Devices; Portable Water Containers; Portable Water Faucets & Taps
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kampiranje in pohodništvo > Prenosna stranišča in prhe: Prenosne prhe in ograde za zasebnost; Prenosni umivalniki in postaje za umivanje; Prenosna stranišča in naprave za uriniranje; Prenosni kanistri za vodo; Prenosne pipe in ventili za vodo
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Stovyklavimas ir žygiai > Nešiojamieji tualetai ir dušai: Nešiojamieji dušai ir privatumo kabinos; Nešiojamos kriauklės ir plovimo stotelės; Nešiojamieji tualetai ir pisuarai; Nešiojamieji vandens indai ir talpos; Nešiojamieji vandens čiaupai ir kraneliai
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Camping et randonnée > Toilettes et douches mobiles: Douches et cabines temporaires mobiles; Lavabos et stations de lavage portables; Toilettes et dispositifs urinaires mobiles; Réservoirs d’eau portables; Robinets et distributeurs d’eau portables
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Κατασκήνωση & πεζοπορία > Φορητές τουαλέτες & ντους: Φορητά ντους & περιφράξεις ιδιωτικότητας; Φορητοί νιπτήρες και σταθμοί πλύσης; Φορητές τουαλέτες & συσκευές ούρησης; Φορητά δοχεία νερού; Φορητές βρύσες
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Camping și drumeții > Toalete și dușuri portabile: Dușuri portabile și incinte pentru intimitate; Chiuvete și stații de spălare portabile; Toalete portabile și dispozitive pentru urinat; Recipiente portabile pentru apă; Baterii și robinete de apă portabile
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Camping, vandring och backpacking > Portabla toaletter och duschar: Portabla duschar och omklädningsutrymmen; Bärbara handfat och tvättstationer; Portabla toaletter och urinbehållare; Bärbara vattenbehållare; Bärbara vattenkranar och tappar
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Kamperen en wandelen > Mobiele wc's en douches: Mobiele douches en privacyschermen; Draagbare wasbakken en wasstations; Mobiele wc's en urinoirs; Draagbare watertanks; Draagbare waterkranen en -tappunten
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 露營和健行 > 流動浴廁: 流動浴室/更衣間; 攜帶式洗手台與清洗站; 流動廁所/小便斗裝置; 攜帶式水箱; 攜帶式水龍頭
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Campismo e caminhada > Chuveiros e sanitas portáteis: Chuveiros portáteis e divisórias de privacidade; Lavatórios e estações de lavagem portáteis; Sanitas portáteis e dispositivos para urinação; Recipientes de água portáteis; Torneiras portáteis
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Camping og fjellvandring > Portable toaletter og dusjer: Portable dusjer og privatlivstelt; Bærbare vasker og vaskestasjoner; Portable toaletter og urineringsapparater; Bærbare vannbeholdere; Bærbare vannkraner
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Camping og vandreture > Flytbare toiletter og brusere: Flytbare brusere og afskærminger; Bærbare håndvaske og vaskestationer; Flytbare toiletter og enheder til vandladning; Bærbare vandbeholdere; Bærbare vandhaner og haner
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 野营与远足 > 移动厕所/淋浴房: 移动淋浴房和隐私围板; 便携式水槽与洗手台; 移动马桶/小便器; 便携式储水容器; 便携式水龙头
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Camping & Wandern > Mobile Toiletten & Duschen: Mobile Duschen & Sichtschutz; Tragbare Waschbecken & Waschstationen; Mobile Toiletten & Urinale; Tragbare Wasserkanister; Tragbare Wasserhähne & Zapfhähne
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Kempovanie a turistika > Prenosné toalety a sprchy: Prenosné sprchy a paravány; Prenosné drezy a umývacie stanice; Prenosné toalety a zariadenia na močenie; Prenosné nádoby na vodu; Prenosné vodovodné batérie a kohútiky
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Campeggio e trekking > Docce e toilette portatili: Docce portatili e tende spogliatoio; Lavandini e postazioni di lavaggio portatili; Bagni da campeggio e orinatoi portatili; Contenitori portatili per acqua; Rubinetti portatili per acqua
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Къмпинг и туризъм > Преносими тоалетни и душове: Преносими душове и заграждения; Преносими мивки и измивни станции; Преносими тоалетни и устройства за уриниране; Преносими контейнери за вода; Преносими водни кранове и чешми
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Acampamento e caminhada > Chuveiros e banheiros portáteis: Recintos privativos e chuveiros portáteis; Pias e estações de lavagem portáteis; Banheiros portáteis; Recipientes portáteis de água; Torneiras portáteis
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kampçılık ve Doğa Yürüyüşü > Taşınabilir Tuvaletler ve Duşlar: Taşınabilir Duşlar ve Paravanlar; Taşınabilir lavabolar ve yıkama istasyonları; Taşınabilir Tuvaletler ve İdrar Çıkarma Cihazları; Taşınabilir su kapları; Taşınabilir su muslukları ve bataryalar
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Retkeily ja vaellus > Kannettavat WC:t ja suihkut: Kannettavat suihkut ja näkösuojat; Matkalavuaarit ja -pesupisteet; Kannettavat WC:t ja virtsasuppilot; Kannettavat vesisäiliöt; Siirrettävät vesihanat